Hawaii statutes.
§666-4 Oral leases not exceeding one year,
valid. Notwithstanding other provisions of law to the contrary, oral
leases of real property for any period not exceeding one year shall be valid
and enforceable to all intents and purposes as if in writing. [L 1929, c 93,
§1; RL 1935, §4016; RL 1945, §10404; RL 1955, §240-4; HRS §666-4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next